Massachusetts, session 194th, S509.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. As used in this act, the following words shall have the following meanings
unless the context clearly requires otherwise:-
"Board", the board of registrars of the town.
"Town", the city known as the town of Randolph.
"Election", the choice by the voters of any public officer and the taking of a vote upon
any question by law submitted to the voters.
of 2

"State election", an election at which a national, state or county officer or a regional
district school committee member elected districtwide is to be chosen by the voters, whether for
a full term or for the filling of a vacancy.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding section 40 of chapter 54 of the General Laws or any other
general or special law to the contrary, in state elections ballots shall be provided to voters in the
town in English and Haitian Creole, in addition to being provided in any other languages
required by law. The state secretary shall prepare such ballots in English and Haitian Creole and
in any other languages required by law.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any general or special law or the charter of the town to the
contrary, in all town preliminary and final elections ballots shall be provided to voters in the
town in English and Haitian Creole, in addition to being provided in any other languages
required by law. The board shall prepare such ballots in English and Haitian Creole and in any
other languages required by law.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the state
secretary shall be responsible for all costs resulting from the implementation of this act in state
elections held in the town, including, without limitation, the production of ballots.
SECTION 5. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 2